Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-497
Raptors; protection; management; raptor permit; raptor permit for wildlife abatement; captive propagation permit; raptor collecting permit; fees.

(1) The commission may take such steps as it deems necessary to provide for the protection and management of raptors. The commission may issue raptor permits for the taking and possession of raptors for the purpose of practicing falconry or wildlife abatement.

(2) A raptor permit for falconry may be issued only to a resident of the state who has paid the fees required in this subsection and has passed a written and oral examination concerning raptors given by the commission or an authorized representative of the commission. The commission shall charge a fee for each permit of not more than twenty-three dollars for persons between twelve and seventeen years of age and not more than sixty-one dollars for persons eighteen years of age and older, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. If the applicant fails to pass the examination, he or she shall not be entitled to reapply for a raptor permit for falconry for a period of six months after the date of the examination. No person under twelve years of age shall be issued a raptor permit for falconry. A person between twelve and seventeen years of age may be issued a permit only if he or she is sponsored by an adult who has a valid raptor permit for falconry and appropriate experience. All raptor permits for falconry shall be nontransferable and shall expire three years after the date of issuance. If the commission is satisfied as to the competency and fitness of an applicant whose permit has expired, his or her permit may be renewed without requiring further examination subject to terms and conditions imposed by the commission. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations outlining species of raptors which may be taken, captured, or held in possession.

(3) A raptor permit for wildlife abatement may be issued only to a resident of the state who has paid the fees required in this subsection and has agreed to comply with federal law concerning raptors used for wildlife abatement as attested to in his or her application. The commission shall charge a fee for each permit of not more than twenty-three dollars for persons between twelve and seventeen years of age and not more than sixty-one dollars for persons eighteen years of age and older, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. No person under twelve years of age shall be issued a raptor permit for wildlife abatement. A person between twelve and seventeen years of age may be issued a permit only if he or she is sponsored and supervised by an adult who has a valid raptor permit for wildlife abatement and appropriate experience. All raptor permits for wildlife abatement shall be nontransferable and shall expire three years after the date of issuance. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this subsection.

(4) The commission may issue captive propagation permits to allow the captive propagation of raptors. A permit may be issued to a resident of the state who has paid the fee required in this subsection. The fee for each permit shall be not more than three hundred five dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. The permit shall be nontransferable, shall expire three years after the date of issuance, and may be renewed under terms and conditions established by the commission. The commission shall authorize the species and the number of each such species which may be taken, captured, acquired, or held in possession. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the issuance and conditions of captive propagation permits.

(5) The commission may issue raptor collecting permits to nonresidents as prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission. The fee for a permit shall be not more than two hundred sixty-five dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327. A raptor collecting permit shall be nontransferable. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the issuance and conditions of raptor collecting permits.

Laws 1971, LB 733, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 154, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 940, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-720;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 207;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 14;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 23;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB374, § 4.